North Dakota, session 69, HB1526.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 11 of section 4.1-41-01 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
11. "Labeling" means the written, printed, or graphic information accompanying the distribution of
commercial feed or customer-formula feed, including promotional materials distributed to
market the feed and statements and promotions through radio, television, or internet interface,
or on an organization's website.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 4.1-41-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
4.1-41-05. Pet food - Specialty pet food - Registration - Exemption - Penalty.
1. Before being distributed in this state, each pet food product and each specialty pet food
product must be registered with the commissioner. This requirement does not apply to a
distributor, provided the pet food or specialty pet food is registered by another person.
2. To register and renew pet food and specialty pet food, a person shall submit:
a. An application form at the time and in the manner required by the commissioner; and
b. A fee in the amount of one hundred twenty dollars per product manufactured ou t - o f - state ;
and
c. A fee in the amount of fifty dollars per product manufactured in the state.
3. To renew a registration required by this section, a person shall submit:
a. An application form at the time and in the manner required by the commissioner; and
b. A fee in the amount of one hundred dollars per product.
4. A registration issued under this section is valid during the period beginning on January first of
an even-numbered year and ending on December thirty-first of the ensuing odd-numbered
year.
5.4. If a person fails to renew a registration within thirty-one days of its expiration, that person must
apply for an initial registration.
6.5. Upon approving an application for an initial registration or a renewed registration, the
commissioner shall furnish a certificate of registration to the applicant. A certificate of
registration is not transferable.
7.6. Any person violating this section is subject to a penalty of twenty-five dollars for each product
that must be registered.

H. B. NO. 1526 - PAGE 2
8.7. A person is exempt from this section if the person:
a. Is a resident of this state;
b. Produces pet food in a noncommercial kitchen;
b.c. Sells the pet food directly to the end consumer at a community event or farmer's market;
and
c.d. Does not use meat, poultry, fish, or their byproducts as an ingredient in the product.

H. B. NO. 1526 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1526.
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 0 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State